Hawaii statutes.
§237D-4 Certificate of registration. (a)
Each operator or plan manager as a condition precedent to engaging or
continuing in the business of furnishing transient accommodations or in
business as a resort time share vacation plan shall register with the director
the name and address of each place of business within the State subject to this
chapter. The operator or plan manager shall make a one-time payment as
follows:

(1) $5 for each registration for transient
accommodations consisting of one to five units;

(2) $15 for each registration for transient
accommodations consisting of six or more units; and

(3) $15 for each resort time share vacation plan
within the State;

upon receipt of which the director shall issue a
certificate of registration in such form as the director determines, attesting
that the registration has been made. The registration shall not be
transferable and shall be valid only for the operator or plan manager in whose
name it is issued and for the transaction of business at the place designated
therein. Acquisition of additional transient accommodation units after payment
of the one-time fee shall not result in additional fees.

(b) The registration, or in lieu thereof a
notice stating where the registration may be inspected and examined, shall at
all times be conspicuously displayed at the place for which it is issued. The
name, phone number, and electronic mail address of the local contact shall at
all times be conspicuously displayed in the same place as the registration or
the same place as the notice stating where the registration may be inspected
and examined. Failure to meet the requirements of this subsection shall be
unlawful. The department may issue citations to any person who fails to
conspicuously display the registration or notice, or the local contact's name,
phone number, or electronic mail address as required by this subsection. A
citation issued pursuant to this subsection for each transient accommodation or
resort time share vacation interest, plan, or unit in violation of this
subsection shall include a monetary fine of not less than:

(1) $500 per day, for a first violation for which a
citation is issued;

(2) $1,000 per day, for a second violation for which
a citation is issued; and

(3) $5,000 per day, for a third and any subsequent
violation for which a citation is issued.

(c) Any advertisement, including an online
advertisement, for any transient accommodation or resort time share vacation
interest, plan, or unit shall conspicuously provide:

(1) The registration identification number or an
electronic link to the registration identification number of the operator or
plan manager issued pursuant to this section; and

(2) The local contact's name, phone number, and
electronic mail address, provided that this paragraph shall be considered
satisfied if this information is provided to the transient or occupant prior to
the furnishing of the transient accommodation or resort time share vacation
unit.

(d) Failure to meet the requirements of
subsection (c) shall be unlawful. The department may issue citations to any
person, including operators, plan managers, and transient accommodations
brokers, who violates subsection (c). A citation issued pursuant to this
subsection for each transient accommodation or resort time share vacation
interest, plan, or unit in violation of subsection (c) shall include a monetary
fine of not less than:

(1) $500 per day, for a first violation for which a
citation is issued;

(2) $1,000 per day, for a second violation for which
a citation is issued; and

(3) $5,000 per day, for a third and any subsequent
violation for which a citation is issued.

(e) The registration provided for by this
section shall be effective until canceled in writing. Any application for the
reissuance of a previously canceled registration identification number shall be
regarded as a new registration application and shall be subject to the payment
of the one-time registration fee. The director may revoke or cancel any
license issued under this chapter for cause as provided by rule under chapter
91.

(f) If the license fee is paid, the department
shall not refuse to issue a registration or revoke or cancel a registration for
the exercise of a privilege protected by the First Amendment of the
Constitution of the United States, or for the carrying on of interstate or
foreign commerce, or for any privilege the exercise of which, under the
Constitution and laws of the United States, cannot be restrained on account of
nonpayment of taxes, nor shall section 237D-14 be invoked to restrain the
exercise of such a privilege, or the carrying on of such commerce.

(g) Any person who may lawfully be required by
the State, and who is required by this chapter, to register as a condition
precedent to engaging or continuing in the business of furnishing transient
accommodations or as a plan manager subject to taxation under this chapter, who
engages or continues in the business without registering in conformity with
this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any director, president,
secretary, or treasurer of a corporation who permits, aids, or abets such
corporation to engage or continue in business without registering in conformity
with this chapter, shall likewise be guilty of a misdemeanor. The penalty for
the misdemeanors shall be the same as that prescribed by section 231-35 for
individuals, corporations, or officers of corporations, as the case may be, for
violation of that section.

(h) Any monetary
fine assessed under this section shall be due and payable thirty days after
issuance of the citation, subject to appeal rights provided under this
subsection. Citations may be appealed to the director of taxation or the
director's designee. [L 1986, c 340, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 241, §5; am
L 1989, c 199, §1; am L 1998, c 156, §17; am L 2015, c 204, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next